District of Columbia statutes.
10-132

Transfer of jurisdiction — Reservation 8.

The jurisdiction and control of such portion of public reservation numbered 8 as may be required for the location and operation of a public convenience station and approaches thereto is hereby transferred from the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army to the Mayor of the District of Columbia, such transfer to take effect from the date of notice by said Mayor to the Chief of Engineers of the United States Army of the portion of said reservation selected, and the Council of the District of Columbia is further authorized to make all necessary rules and regulations for the management of said station and fix the charges to be made for the use thereof.

History

May 26, 1908, 35 Stat. 286, ch. 198

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-132.
1973 Ed., § 8-138.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(182) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.